Hawaii statutes.
§147-57 Department, rules and regulations,
contracts, cooperation, fees. The department of agriculture, in addition
to powers granted by this part or any other law, shall have all powers
necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate this part, including the
following:

(1) To prescribe rules and regulations, not
inconsistent with this part, respecting: the standards for grading and
classifying, and the grades, standards, and classification for, food products;
the inspection, grading, and classification of food products; the determination
and certification of the grade, classification, quality, and condition of food
products and such other pertinent facts as the department may deem advisable;
the licensing of inspectors, graders, and samplers and the duties of such
inspectors, graders, and samplers; methods of test, analysis, and examination
in determining the grade, classification, quality, and condition of food
products; the official word or words, figure, or letter to indicate official
grade or standards of quality or condition of food products; the design, form,
and use of official labels and statements for use on packages or containers of
products inspected, graded, classified, and certified under this part; and
continuous factory inspection, grading, classification, and certification of
food products;

(2) To contract with the United States Department of
Agriculture for the services of an inspector or inspectors employed by the
department and the establishment of a cooperative inspection service with the
United States government;

(3) To cooperate with the United States or any
department thereof, in accomplishing the matters or things provided for herein;

(4) To fix, assess, and collect, or cause to be
collected, fees for inspecting or classifying food products, such fees to be on
a uniform basis in an amount reasonably necessary to cover, as nearly as may
be, the cost of the inspection and the administration of this part; provided
that the department may adjust the fees to be collected hereunder to meet the
expenses necessary to carry out the provisions hereof and may prescribe a
different scale of fees for different localities; and provided further that the
department may prescribe a reasonable charge for traveling expenses and
services. Charges for continuous factory inspection and grading may be fixed,
assessed, and collected on such contract basis as will reimburse the State for
the salary and all expenses of the factory inspector or grader, to which shall
be added an appropriate percentage of charges assessed to cover, as nearly as
practicable, administrative overhead expense. [L 1947, c 195, §7; RL 1955,
§22-46; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-57]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see
chapter 91.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next